Illinois, session 104th, HB2559.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Residential Real Property Disclosure Act is 5amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 77/35)7    Sec. 35. Disclosure report form. The disclosures required 8of a seller by this Act shall be made in the following form: 9RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY DISCLOSURE REPORT10    NOTICE: THE PURPOSE OF THIS REPORT IS TO PROVIDE 11PROSPECTIVE BUYERS WITH INFORMATION ABOUT MATERIAL DEFECTS IN 12THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY BEFORE THE SIGNING OF A 13CONTRACT. THIS REPORT DOES NOT LIMIT THE PARTIES' RIGHT TO 14CONTRACT FOR THE SALE OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY IN "AS IS" 15CONDITION. UNDER COMMON LAW, SELLERS WHO DISCLOSE MATERIAL 16DEFECTS MAY BE UNDER A CONTINUING OBLIGATION TO ADVISE THE 17PROSPECTIVE BUYERS ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE RESIDENTIAL REAL 18PROPERTY EVEN AFTER THE REPORT IS DELIVERED TO THE PROSPECTIVE 19BUYER. COMPLETION OF THIS REPORT BY THE SELLER CREATES LEGAL 20OBLIGATIONS ON THE SELLER; THEREFORE THE SELLER MAY WISH TO 21CONSULT AN ATTORNEY PRIOR TO COMPLETION OF THIS REPORT. 22Property Address: ........................................... 23City, State & Zip Code: ..................................... HB2559- 2 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b1Seller's Name: ..........................................2    This Report is a disclosure of certain conditions of the 3residential real property listed above in compliance with the 4Residential Real Property Disclosure Act. This information is 5provided as of ...(month) ...(day) ...(year). The disclosures 6herein shall not be deemed warranties of any kind by the seller 7or any person representing any party in this transaction.8    In this form, "aware" means to have actual notice or 9actual knowledge without any specific investigation or 10inquiry. In this form, "material defect" means a condition 11that would have a substantial adverse effect on the value of 12the residential real property or that would significantly 13impair the health or safety of future occupants of the 14residential real property unless the seller reasonably 15believes that the condition has been corrected.16    The seller discloses the following information with the 17knowledge that even though the statements herein are not 18deemed to be warranties, prospective buyers may choose to rely 19on this information in deciding whether or not and on what 20terms to purchase the residential real property. 21    The seller represents that to the best of his or her actual 22knowledge, the following statements have been accurately noted 23as "yes" (correct), "no" (incorrect), or "not applicable" to 24the property being sold. If the seller indicates that the 25response to any statement, except number 1, is yes or not 26applicable, the seller shall provide an explanation in the   HB2559- 3 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b1additional information area of this form. 2YESNON/A31................Seller has occupied the property4 within the last 12 months.56 (If "no," please identify capacity or explain relationship to property.)72. ..... ..... ..... I currently have flood hazard 8 insurance on the property. 93................I am aware of flooding or recurring10 leakage problems in the crawl11 space or basement.124................I am aware that the property is13 located in a floodplain.145................I am aware of material defects in15 the basement or foundation16 (including cracks and bulges).176................I am aware of leaks or material18 defects in the roof, ceilings, or19 chimney. 207................I am aware of material defects in21 the walls, windows, doors, or floors.228................I am aware of material defects in23 the electrical system.249................I am aware of material defects in25 the plumbing system (includes26 such things as water heater, sump  HB2559- 4 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b1 pump, water treatment system,2 sprinkler system, and swimming3 pool). 410................I am aware of material defects in 5 the well or well equipment.611................I am aware of unsafe conditions in7 the drinking water.812................I am aware of material defects in9 the heating, air conditioning, or10 ventilating systems. 1113................I am aware of material defects in12 the fireplace or woodburning 13 stove.1414................I am aware of material defects in15 the septic, sanitary sewer, or16 other disposal system.1715................I am aware of unsafe concentrations18 of radon on the premises.1916................I am aware of unsafe concentrations20 of or unsafe conditions relating21 to asbestos on the premises. 2217................I am aware of unsafe concentrations23 of or unsafe conditions relating24 to lead paint, lead water pipes,25 lead plumbing pipes or lead in26 the soil on the premises.  HB2559- 5 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b118................I am aware of mine subsidence,2 underground pits, settlement,3 sliding, upheaval, or other earth4 stability defects on the5 premises.619................I am aware of current infestations7 of termites or other wood boring8 insects. 920................I am aware of a structural defect10 caused by previous infestations11 of termites or other wood boring12 insects. 1321................I am aware of underground fuel14 storage tanks on the property.1522................I am aware of boundary or lot line16 disputes. 1723................I have received notice of violation18 of local, state or federal laws19 or regulations relating to this20 property, which violation has not21 been corrected.2224................I am aware that this property has 23 been used for the manufacture 24 of methamphetamine as 25 defined in Section 10 of 26 the Methamphetamine Control   HB2559- 6 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b1 and Community Protection Act. 225................I am aware that the roof of this 3property is ..... years old.4    Note: These disclosures are not intended to cover the 5common elements of a condominium, but only the actual 6residential real property including limited common elements 7allocated to the exclusive use thereof that form an integral 8part of the condominium unit. 9    Note: These disclosures are intended to reflect the 10current condition of the premises and do not include previous 11problems, if any, that the seller reasonably believes have 12been corrected.13    If any of the above are marked "not applicable" or "yes", 14please explain here or use additional pages, if necessary: 15.. 16............................................................. 17.............................................................18    Check here if additional pages used: .....19    Seller certifies that seller has prepared this report and 20certifies that the information provided is based on the actual 21notice or actual knowledge of the seller without any specific 22investigation or inquiry on the part of the seller. The seller 23hereby authorizes any person representing any principal in 24this transaction to provide a copy of this report, and to 25disclose any information in the report, to any person in 26connection with any actual or anticipated sale of the   HB2559- 7 -LRB104 08376 JRC 18427 b1property. 2    (This paragraph shall be printed in boldface type.) THE 3SELLER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE SELLER IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE 4THIS DISCLOSURE REPORT TO THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER BEFORE THE 5SIGNING OF THE CONTRACT AND HAS A CONTINUING OBLIGATION, 6PURSUANT TO SECTION 30 OF THE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY 7DISCLOSURE ACT, TO SUPPLEMENT THIS DISCLOSURE PRIOR TO 8CLOSING. 9Seller: ............................... Date: ............... 10Seller: ............................... Date: ...........11    THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER IS AWARE THAT THE PARTIES MAY CHOOSE 12TO NEGOTIATE AN AGREEMENT FOR THE SALE OF THE PROPERTY SUBJECT 13TO ANY OR ALL MATERIAL DEFECTS DISCLOSED IN THIS REPORT ("AS 14IS"). THIS DISCLOSURE IS NOT A SUBSTITUTE FOR ANY INSPECTIONS 15OR WARRANTIES THAT THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER OR SELLER MAY WISH TO 16OBTAIN OR NEGOTIATE. (The remainder of this paragraph shall be 17printed in boldface type.) THE FACT THAT THE SELLER IS NOT 18AWARE OF A PARTICULAR CONDITION OR PROBLEM IS NO GUARANTEE 19THAT IT DOES NOT EXIST. THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER IS AWARE THAT THE 20PROSPECTIVE BUYER MAY REQUEST AN INSPECTION OF THE PREMISES 21PERFORMED BY A QUALIFIED PROFESSIONAL. 22Prospective Buyer: .................. Date: ...... Time: .... 23Prospective Buyer: .................. Date: ...... Time: ....24(Source: P.A. 102-765, eff. 5-13-22.)